src/fst/morphology/stems/conjunctors.lexc
!! Conjunctors
!  ----------
!! Conjunctors in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language 

LEXICON Conjunctors

ʔi+CC:ʔi # "and" ;
gʷəl+CC:gʷəl # "and" ;
gʷələ+CC:gʷələ # "and" ;
yəxʷ+CC:yəxʷ # "and" ;
ʔabil̕+CS:ʔabil̕ # "if" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
